Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2704
City, defined.

City shall mean any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class, city of the first class, city of the second class, or village, including any city operated under a home rule charter. City shall also include any group of two or more cities acting in concert under the terms of the Interlocal Cooperation Act or Joint Public Agency Act by means of a properly executed agreement.

Laws 1991, LB 840, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 64.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.